Arkansas statutes. Title 21 Public Officers and Employees
Chapter 10

Uniform Facsimile Signatures of Public Officials Act

21-10-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Public security” means a bond, note, certificate of indebtedness, or other obligation for the payment of money, issued by this state or by any of its departments, agencies, or other instrumentalities, or by any of its political subdivisions;

“Instrument of payment” means a check, draft, warrant, or order for the payment, delivery, or transfer of funds;

“Authorized officer” means any official of this state or any of its departments, agencies, or other instrumentalities, or any of its political subdivisions whose signature to a public security or instrument of payment is required or permitted;

“Facsimile signature” means the reproduction of the manual signature of an authorized officer by saving electronically or by engraving, imprinting, stamping, or other means.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The 2017 amendment of this section was not based on an official revision of the Uniform Facsimile Signatures of Public Officials Act by the Uniform Law Commission.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (d), inserted “of the manual signature of an authorized officer by saving electronically or” and deleted “of the manual signature of an unauthorized officer” following “or other means”.

Ark. L. Rev.

Carroll, Uniform Laws in Arkansas, 52 Ark. L. Rev. 313.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 69, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2601; Acts 2017, No. 369, § 2.

21-10-102. Use of facsimile signature authorized — Filing required.

Any authorized officer may, after filing with the Secretary of State his or her manual signature certified by him or her under oath, execute or cause to be executed with a facsimile signature in lieu of his or her manual signature:

Any public security; and

Any instrument of payment.

Upon compliance with this chapter by the authorized officer, his or her facsimile signature has the same legal effect as his or her manual signature and shall be deemed to comply with any statute requiring a manual signature.

A.C.R.C. Notes. The 1983 and the 2017 amendments of this section were not based on an official revision of the Uniform Facsimile Signatures of Public Officials Act by the Uniform Law Commission.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment inserted “or her” throughout the section.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 69, § 2; 1983, No. 564, § 1; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2602; Acts 2017, No. 369, § 3.

21-10-103. Use of facsimile seal.

When the seal of this state or any of its departments, agencies, or other instrumentalities, or of any of its political subdivisions is required in the execution of a public security or instrument of payment, the authorized officer may cause the seal to be printed, engraved, stamped, or otherwise placed in facsimile thereon. The facsimile seal has the same legal effect as the impression of the seal.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 69, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2603.

21-10-104. [Reserved.]

Publisher's Notes. The Uniform Facsimile Signatures of Public Officials Act (U.L.A.) § 4, which was repealed in Arkansas by Acts 1975, No. 928, § 4, was a penalty clause.

21-10-105. Construction.

This chapter shall be so construed as to effectuate its general purpose to make uniform the law of states which enact it.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 69, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2605.

21-10-106. Title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Uniform Facsimile Signature of Public Officials Act.”

History.

Acts 1959, No. 69, § 6; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2606.

21-10-107. Severability.

If any provision of this chapter or the application thereof to any person or circumstance is held invalid, the invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications of the chapter which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions of this chapter are severable.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 69, § 7; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2606n.

21-10-108. Inconsistent acts repealed.

All acts and parts of acts are repealed insofar as inconsistent herewith.

History.

Acts 1959, No. 69, § 8; A.S.A. 1947, § 12-2606n.

21-10-109. [Reserved.]

Publisher's Notes. The Uniform Facsimile Signatures of Public Officials Act (U.L.A.) § 9, which was an effective date provision, was not adopted in Arkansas.